fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-mayakask_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mayakask - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, palate	AEW V-initial NDI3
  
     mayakask+N+I+D+PxX+Sg: mayakask
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nayakask
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kayakask
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nayakaskonân
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kayakaskonaw
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kayakaskowâw
     
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: wayakask
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg: wayakaskowâw
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: wayakaskoyiw

     mayakask+N+I+D+PxX+Pl: mayakaskwa
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nayakaskwa
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kayakaskwa
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nayakaskonâna
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kayakaskonawa
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kayakaskowâwa
     
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl: wayakaskwa
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl: wayakaskowâwa
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: wayakaskoyiwa

     mayakask+N+I+D+PxX+Loc: mayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nayakaskonâhk
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kayakaskonâhk
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kayakaskowâhk

     mayakask+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: wayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: wayakaskowâhk
     mayakask+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: wayakaskoyihk

     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Sg:      [mayakaskos,     mayakaskosis]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nayakaskos,     nayakaskosis]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kayakaskos,     kayakaskosis]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nayakaskosinân, nayakaskosisinân]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kayakaskosinaw, kayakaskosisinaw]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kayakaskosiwâw, kayakaskosisiwâw]

     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg:    [wayakaskos,     wayakaskosis]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg:    [wayakaskosiwâw, wayakaskosisiwâw]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [wayakaskosiyiw, wayakaskosisiyiw]

     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Pl:      [mayakaskosa,     mayakaskosisa]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nayakaskosa,     nayakaskosisa]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kayakaskosa,     kayakaskosisa]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nayakaskosinâna, nayakaskosisinâna]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kayakaskosinawa, kayakaskosisinawa]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kayakaskosiwâwa, kayakaskosisiwâwa]
     
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl:    [wayakaskosa,      wayakaskosisa]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl:    [wayakaskosiwâwa,  wayakaskosisiwâwa]
     mayakask+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [wayakaskosiyiwa,  wayakaskosisiyiwa]
